Washington statutes.
RCW 15.125.030

Cannabis and cannabis products—Production and processing.

(1) No cannabis or cannabis product may be labeled, sold, or represented as produced or processed under the standards established under this chapter unless produced or processed by a person certified by the department under the program established under this chapter.

(2) No person may represent, sell, or offer for sale any cannabis or cannabis products as produced or processed under standards adopted under this chapter if the person knows, or has reason to know, that the cannabis or cannabis product has not been produced or processed in conformance with the standards established under this chapter.

(3) No person may represent, sell, or offer for sale any cannabis or cannabis products as "organic products" as that term has meaning under chapter 15.86 RCW.

[ 2022 c 16 s 16; 2017 c 317 s 20.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Application—2017 c 317: See notes following RCW 69.50.325.